Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2751XS (2) 91 cm/jh S.F. 430 Section 1. Section 669.21, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The duty to indemnify and hold harmless Subsection 1 3 shall not apply and the state shall be entitled to restitution 4 from an employee if the employee fails to cooperate in the 5 investigation or defense of the claim, as defined in this 6 section , or if, in an action commenced by the state against the 7 employee, it is determined that the conduct of the employee 8 upon which a tort claim or demand was based constituted a 9 willful and wanton act or omission or malfeasance in office. 10 The state shall commence an action for restitution in every 11 case in which there is a reasonable belief that the action for 12 restitution is warranted. 13